Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1581
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Low-Level Radioactive Waste Disposal Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 81-1582 to 81-1597 shall be used.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 4;

Laws 1987, LB 426, § 4;

Laws 1988, LB 1092, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 761, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1201, § 4.